Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2023
Board; membership; qualifications.

The board shall consist of eight members, including at least two public members. Two of the six professional members of the board shall be officials or members of the instructional staff of an accredited medical school in this state. One of the six professional members of the board shall be a person who has a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state. Beginning December 1, 2020, one of the six professional members of the board shall be a physician with experience in practice with physician assistants.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 681;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 10.